Massachusetts, session 194th, H3683.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall conduct a comprehensive transit service
assessment relative to establishing a minimum of future direct bus rapid transit between Kendall
Square in Cambridge, Allston, North Brighton and the Longwood Medical Area in Boston.
SECTION 2. The assessment shall focus on identifying the transit infrastructure that
needs to be preserved for a minimum of future direct bus rapid transit alternatives between
Kendall Square in Cambridge, Allston, North Brighton and the Longwood Medical Area in
Boston, reviewing the prospect of constructing and operating on existing rights of way,
analyzing the impact of planned, designed, funded or under construction transportation or
of 2

development projects nearby, defining the potential market for these future transit services, and
evaluating the potential economic benefits to the region and to the Commonwealth as a whole.
SECTION 3. The department shall make recommendations on the preferred route and
how to preserve the transit infrastructure necessary for a minimum of future direct bus rapid
transit alternatives between Kendall Square in Cambridge, Allston, North Brighton and the
Longwood Medical Area in Boston, taking into consideration nearby transportation and
development projects that have been studied, designed, funded, or are under construction. The
department shall file a report with the clerks of the house and senate, the house and senate
committee on ways and means, and the joint committee on transportation not later than July 31,
2022.
of 2